Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1475.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-207, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-207. Order of adjudication; noncriminal; use as evidence A. Except as provided by section 13-904, subsection H, section 13-2921.01, section 15-342.06 or 17-340 or sections 28-3304, 28-3306 and 28-3320, an order of the juvenile court in proceedings under this chapter shall not be deemed a conviction of crime, impose any civil disabilities ordinarily resulting from a conviction or operate to disqualify the juvenile in any civil service application or appointment. B. The disposition of a juvenile in the juvenile court may not be used against the juvenile in any case or proceeding other than a criminal or juvenile case in any court, whether before or after reaching majority, except as provided by section 13-2921.01, section 15-342.06 or 17-340 or sections 28-3304, 28-3306 and 28-3320. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 15, chapter 3, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-342.06, to read: START_STATUTE15-342.06. Interscholastic activities and programs; student eligibility; criminal conduct A school district governing board shall: 1. Prohibit a student from participating in an interscholastic activity or program that is sponsored by the school district if the student has been convicted of, has admitted in open court to, has pleaded no contest to or has admitted pursuant to a plea agreement to committing any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a similar offense in another jurisdiction or a delinquent act that if committed by an adult would constitute any of the following criminal offenses: (a) Aggravated assault pursuant to section 13-1204 that involves a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument or that results in serious physical injury. (b) Any offense that involves a violation of title 13, chapter 14. (c) Harassment pursuant to section 13-2921 or 13-2921.01 involving sexually explicit communications or conduct. (d) Stalking pursuant to section 13-2923. (e) Commercial sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3552. (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3553. (g) Luring a minor for sexual exploitation pursuant to section 13-3554 or 13-3560. (h) Domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601. (i) Incest pursuant to section 13-3608. 2. On notice that a student is charged with or awaiting trial on any criminal offense listed in paragraph 1 of this section or a delinquent act that if committed by an adult would constitute any criminal offense listed in paragraph 1 of this section, prohibit the student from participating in an interscholastic activity or program that is sponsored by the school until the charges against the student are dismissed or the student is found to be not guilty. 3. Require any student who participates or seeks to participate in an interscholastic activity or program that is sponsored by the school to certify on a form provided by the school district whether the student has been convicted of, has admitted in open court to, has pleaded no contest to or has admitted pursuant to a plea agreement to committing any criminal offense listed in paragraph 1 of this section in this state or a similar offense in another jurisdiction or a delinquent act that if committed by an adult would constitute any criminal offense listed in paragraph 1 of this section. END_STATUTE